District of Columbia statutes.
26-1152.17

No advance waivers.

A provision in a covered loan whereby a borrower waives in advance a violation of this chapter shall be void.

History

May 7, 2002, D.C. Law 14-132, § 217, 49 DCR 2551

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 217 of Home Loan Protection Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-295, March 1, 2002, 49 DCR 2534).